Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8229
Rehabilitative services, defined.

Rehabilitative services means a system or collection of comprehensive medical and therapy services that are interdisciplinary, coordinated, and resource-intense with the goal of restoring physical, cognitive, psychological, social, and vocational functioning so that an individual can return to home, work, or society, becoming a productive participant in his or her community.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 29;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 7.